District of Columbia statutes.
9-204.07

Submission of bill to involved advisory neighborhood commission.

(a)

The initiator of a proposal to name or rename a public space shall:

(1)

Submit a petition to the Council in support of the proposal which is signed by a majority of owners of property abutting the public space to be named or renamed, prior to Council adoption of a bill to designate the naming or renaming; and

(2)

Pay fees to the District government, which shall be established by the Mayor by rulemaking, for all costs associated with the consideration of the proposal by the Council and the Mayor, if the proposal is enacted, all costs associated with the implementation of the proposal by the District government, including, but not limited to, the costs of installing and maintaining signs which designate the name of the public space.

(b)

Prior to consideration by a committee of the Council of a bill to name or rename a public space, the Mayor shall provide the Council with the following:

(1)

A surveyor’s plat showing the public space to be named or renamed, the square in or adjacent to which the public space is located, and the abutting square of the affected area;

(2)

A report on the number of mailing addresses affected by the proposal, the number of signs required to implement the proposal, and the fiscal impact of considering and implementing the proposal; and

(3)

A report to the Council that all abutting property owners have been notified of the proposed symbolic name designation.

(c)

Not less than 30 days prior to Council consideration of a bill to name or rename a public space in the District of Columbia, the Council shall submit a copy of the bill for review and comment to each Advisory Neighborhood Commission in which the public space is located.

History

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 407, 30 DCR 148
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-236, § 2(c), 44 DCR 917

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-457.